Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201319-5203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act:

(1) Board means
the board of directors of a land bank;

(2) Land bank means a land bank established
in accordance with the act;

(3) Municipality means any city or village
of this state that is located (a) within a county in which a city of the metropolitan
class is located or (b) within a county in which at least three cities of
the first class are located; and

(4) Real property means lands, lands under
water, structures, and any and all easements, air rights, franchises, and
incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable,
including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise,
and any and all fixtures and improvements located thereon.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 3.